Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.123.040

Foundation's report to the board.

By January 1, 2016, and annually each January 1st thereafter, the foundation contracted with under RCW 28B.123.030 shall report to the board regarding the program, including:

(1) An accounting of receipts and disbursements of the foundation's separate scholarship award account including any realized or unrealized gains or losses and the resulting change in account balance;

(2) A list of the program participants and the scholarship amount awarded, by year; and

(3) Other outcome measures necessary for the board to assess the impacts of the program.

[ 2015 c 215 s 4.]